Vermont, session 2025-2026, H201.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 495 is amended to read:
§ 495. UNLAWFUL EMPLOYMENT PRACTICE
(a) It shall be unlawful employment practice, except where a bona fide
occupational qualification requires persons individuals of a particular race,
color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
ancestry, place of birth, age, crime victim status, criminal history, or physical
or mental condition:
VT LEG #378639 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.201
2025 Page 2 of 8
(1) For any employer, employment agency, or labor organization to
harass or discriminate against any individual because of race, color, religion,
ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, place of birth,
crime victim status, criminal history, or age or against a qualified individual
with a disability.
(2) For any person individual seeking employees or for any employment
agency or labor organization to cause to be printed, published, or circulated
any notice or advertisement relating to employment or membership indicating
any preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination based upon race,
color, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, place of birth, crime victim status, criminal history, age, or disability.
(3) For any employment agency to fail or refuse to classify properly or
refer for employment or to otherwise harass or discriminate against any
individual because of race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, place of birth, crime victim status, criminal
history, or age or against a qualified individual with a disability.
(4) For any labor organization to limit, segregate, or qualify its
membership with respect to any individual because of race, color, religion,
ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, place of birth,
crime victim status, criminal history, or age or against a qualified individual
with a disability.
VT LEG #378639 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.201
2025 Page 3 of 8
* * *
(l) The provisions of this section prohibiting discrimination on the basis of
criminal history shall not be construed to prohibit or prevent an employer from
discharging or refusing to hire an individual for a position:
(1) for which any federal or State law or regulation creates a mandatory
or presumptive disqualification based on one or more types of criminal
offenses for which the individual has been convicted or is subject to a pending
criminal charge;
(2) if the employer or an affiliate of the employer is subject to an
obligation imposed by any federal or State law or regulation not to employ in
that position any individual who has been convicted of one or more types of
criminal offenses for which the individual has been convicted or is subject to a
pending criminal charge; or
(3) that bears a substantial relationship to one or more types of criminal
offenses for which the individual has been convicted or is subject to a pending
criminal charge.
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 495d is amended to read:
§ 495d. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
VT LEG #378639 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.201
2025 Page 4 of 8
(18) “Criminal history” means all information related to an individual’s
contact with the criminal justice system, including data regarding
identification, arrest or citation, arraignment, judicial disposition, custody, and
supervision.
Sec. 3. 9 V.S.A. § 4501 is amended to read:
§ 4501. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(14) “Criminal history” means all information related to an individual’s
contact with the criminal justice system, including data regarding
identification, arrest or citation, arraignment, judicial disposition, custody, and
supervision.
Sec. 4. 9 V.S.A. § 4502 is amended to read:
§ 4502. PUBLIC ACCOMMODATIONS
(a) An owner or operator of a place of public accommodation or an agent
or employee of such owner or operator shall not, because of the race, creed,
color, national origin, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, or gender identity,
or criminal history of any person, refuse, withhold from, or deny to that person
any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, and privileges of the place
of public accommodation.
* * *
VT LEG #378639 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.201
2025 Page 5 of 8
Sec. 5. 9 V.S.A. § 4503 is amended to read:
§ 4503. UNFAIR HOUSING PRACTICES
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person:
(1) To refuse to sell or rent, or refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental
of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling or other real estate to
any person because of the race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, criminal history, or
disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with
one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of public
assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(2) To discriminate against, or to harass, any person in the terms,
conditions, privileges, and protections of the sale or rental of a dwelling or
other real estate, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with
a dwelling or other real estate, because of the race, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national origin,
criminal history, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to
occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a
recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual
assault, or stalking.
(3) To make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or
published, any notice, statement, or advertisement, with respect to the sale or
VT LEG #378639 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.201
2025 Page 6 of 8
rental of a dwelling or other real estate that indicates any preference,
limitation, or discrimination based on race, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, criminal
history, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a
dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of
public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or
stalking.
(4) To represent to any person because of the race, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national
origin, criminal history, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to
occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a
recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual
assault, or stalking, that any dwelling or other real estate is not available for
inspection, sale, or rental when the dwelling or real estate is in fact so
available.
* * *
(6) To discriminate against any person in the making or purchasing of
loans or providing other financial assistance for real-estate-related transactions
or in the selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property, because
of the race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital status,
religious creed, color, national origin, criminal history, or disability of a
VT LEG #378639 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.201
2025 Page 7 of 8
person, or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more
minor children, or because a person is a recipient of public assistance, or
because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(7) To engage in blockbusting practices, for profit, which may include
inducing or attempting to induce a person to sell or rent a dwelling by
representations regarding the entry into the neighborhood of a person or
persons of a particular race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, criminal history, or
disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with
one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of public
assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(8) To deny any person access to or membership or participation in any
multiple listing service, real estate brokers’ organization, or other service,
organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings,
or to discriminate against any person in the terms or conditions of such access,
membership, or participation, on account of race, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national origin,
criminal history, or disability of a person, or because a person is a recipient of
public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or
stalking.
* * *
VT LEG #378639 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.201
2025 Page 8 of 8
(12) To discriminate in land use decisions or in the permitting of
housing because of race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital
status, religious creed, color, national origin, criminal history, disability, the
presence of one or more minor children, income, or because of the receipt of
public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or
stalking, except as otherwise provided by law.
* * *
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378639 v.2